Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services  shall commission a study on the
scope of child abuse investigations in  this state. The department shall contract with a
facilitator who specializes in public policy  to conduct the study. The contract must require
that the facilitator, in consultation with the advisory committee established under sub-
section (4) of this section:
(a) Provide a presentation of the facilitator’s  preliminary findings and recommendations,
including any recommendations for legislation, to the interim legislative committees  on child
welfare no later than September 30, 2024.
(b) Submit a final report  on the facilitator’s findings and recommendations, including
recommendations for legislation, to the  interim committees on child welfare, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, no later than September 15, 2025.
(2) The study must at a minimum:
(a) Identify the current scope of mandatory child  abuse investigations that must be
conducted by the Department of Human Services.
(b) Identify gaps or duplication of work in the state’s response to concerns of child abuse.
(c) Determine the national best practices  on trauma-informed child abuse jurisdiction,
child abuse definitions, child  abuse investigations, child abuse multidisciplinary teams and
due process.
(3) The facilitator’s recommendations must at a minimum describe or propose:
(a) Recommended jurisdiction of child abuse investigations conducted by the department.
(b) Recommended amendments to child abuse definitions.
(c) Other recommended national best practices for  investigations of child abuse by the
department.
(d) Recommendations for the ongoing interdisciplinary  oversight of the facilitator’s
findings and implementation of the facilitator’s recommendations.
(4)(a) The department  shall appoint a committee to advise the facilitator in conducting
the study and preparing the presentation and report described in this section. The committee
membership must include individuals with lived experience with child  abuse, including child
abuse investigations, and  professionals or representatives of organizations involved with
children. Such professionals or representatives shall include, but need not be limited to,  one
or more of each of the following:
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 1
(A) Attorneys representing children.
(B) Child care providers.
(C) Child welfare certified resource parents.
(D) Representatives of children’s advocacy centers, as defined in ORS 418.782.
(E) Children’s behavioral health professionals.
(F) Community developmental disabilities programs.
(G) Representatives of county juvenile departments.
(H) Representatives with extensive experience  with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act
and Oregon Indian tribes and a deep  understanding of rural and urban tribal populations,
appointed after consultation with the Commission on Indian Services.
(I) Licensed and classified school employees and school administrators.
(J) Representatives of the Oregon District Attorneys Association.
(K) Representatives of  the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police and Oregon State Sheriffs’
Association.
(L) Representatives of the Department of Education.
(M) Representatives of the Department of Human Services.
(N) Representatives of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(O) Representatives of the Department of Justice.
(P) Representatives of professionals who are licensed, certified or endorsed  to provide
services to children.
(Q) Relevant advocates for children.
(R) Representatives of social justice organizations.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint as a nonvoting member a person
who is a circuit court judge who hears dependency cases.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall commission a study of Oregon’s
response to children exhibiting  problematic sexual behavior. The department shall contract
with a facilitator who specializes in public  policy to conduct the study. The contract must
require that the facilitator, in  consultation with the advisory committee established under
subsection (4) of this section:
(a) Provide a presentation of the facilitator’s  preliminary findings and recommendations,
including any recommendations for legislation, to the interim legislative committees  on child
welfare no later than September 30, 2024.
(b) Submit a final report on the  facilitator’s findings and recommendations, including any
recommendations for legislation, to the  interim committees on child welfare, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, no later than September 15, 2025.
(2) The study must at a minimum:
(a) Identify the current state of services  and resources available to children exhibiting
problematic sexual behavior and which of those services and resources are available to chil-
dren under 12 years of age.
(b) Identify the current state of services and resources  available to the families and
caregivers of children exhibiting problematic sexual behavior.
(c) Identify gaps in the response and services available to children exhibiting problematic
sexual behavior and to the families and caregivers of such children.
(d) Determine the national best practices on trauma-informed multidisciplinary re-
sponses to children exhibiting problematic sexual behavior.
(e) Analyze solutions to identify  and provide support, treatment and resources for chil-
dren exhibiting problematic sexual behavior and for the  families and caregivers of such
children.
(3) The facilitator’s recommendations must at a minimum describe or propose:
(a) Trauma-informed and national best  practice strategies for identification of children
exhibiting problematic sexual behaviors;
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 2
(b) Strategies and definitions to ensure a child is not identified  as exhibiting problematic
sexual behavior as a result of the child’s:
(A) Sexual orientation, gender identity or disability; or
(B) Consensual sexual activity or exploration, provided the  activity or exploration is not
criminal or abusive in nature;
(c) Services  and treatment for children exhibiting problematic sexual behavior, provided
such services and treatment are trauma-informed,  family centered programs and
community-based;
(d) Comprehensive resources and educational opportunities to support  family members
and caregivers impacted by children exhibiting problematic sexual behavior;
(e) National best practices for assessing the safety of children impacted by  another
child’s problematic sexual behavior; and
(f) Strategies to prevent and minimize out-of-home placement or incarceration of chil-
dren exhibiting problematic sexual behavior.
(4)(a) The department  shall appoint a committee to advise the facilitator in conducting
the study and preparing the presentation and report described in this section. The committee
membership must include members of families with lived experience  with a child exhibiting
problematic sexual behavior and professionals or  representatives of organizations involved
with children exhibiting problematic sexual behaviors.  Such professionals or representatives
shall include, but need not be limited to, one or more of each of the following:
(A) Attorneys representing children.
(B) Child welfare certified resource parents.
(C) Representatives of children’s advocacy centers, as defined in ORS 418.782.
(D) Children’s behavioral health professionals.
(E) Community developmental disabilities programs.
(F) Representatives of county juvenile departments.
(G) Representatives with extensive experience  with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act
and Oregon Indian tribes and a deep  understanding of rural and urban tribal populations,
appointed after consultation with the Commission on Indian Services.
(H) Representatives of county  child abuse multidisciplinary teams with existing prob-
lematic sexual behavior subcommittees.
(I) Representatives of the Oregon District Attorneys Association.
(J) Representatives of the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police and  Oregon State Sheriffs’
Association.
(K) Representatives of the Department of Education.
(L) Representatives of the Department of Human Services.
(M) Representatives of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(N) Representatives of the Department of Justice.
(O) Representatives of professionals who are  licensed, certified or endorsed to provide
services to children.
(P) Relevant advocates for children.
(Q) Representatives of social justice organizations.
(R) Licensed and classified school employees and school administrators.
(b) The committee must include as a nonvoting member a person appointed by the  Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court who is a circuit court judge who hears dependency cases.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for child welfare programs, is increased by $230,946
for carrying out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 3
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$77,640 for carrying out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4086 (HB 4086-B) Page 4